Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB10.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1676YC (5) 91 jda/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 136A.5B, subsection 3, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 3. The department shall publish the informational 3 materials on its internet site and shall specifically make the 4 informational materials available electronically to child care 5 facilities and child care homes as defined in section 237A.1 , 6 school nurses, athletic trainers employed by school districts, 7 hospitals, attending health care providers, and other health 8 care providers offering care to pregnant women and infants. 9 Sec. 2. Section 256.11, subsection 9B, Code 2025, is amended 10 to read as follows: 11 9B. a. Beginning July 1, 2007 2025 , each school district 12 shall have employ a school nurse or an athletic trainer to 13 provide health services to its students. Each school district 14 shall work toward the goal of having employing one school nurse 15 or athletic trainer for every seven hundred fifty students 16 enrolled in the school district. 17 b. For purposes of this subsection , âschool nurseâ : 18 (1) âAthletic trainerâ means a person licensed under chapter 19 152D. 20 (2) âSchool nurseâ means a person who holds an endorsement 21 or a statement of professional recognition for school nurses 22 issued by the board of educational examiners under subchapter 23 VII, part 3 . 24 Sec. 3. Section 257.31, subsection 5, paragraph m, Code 25 2025, is amended to read as follows: 26 m. The addition of one or more teacher librarians pursuant 27 to section 256.11, subsection 9 , one or more guidance 28 counselors pursuant to section 256.11, subsection 9A , or one 29 or more school nurses or athletic trainers pursuant to section 30 256.11, subsection 9B . 31 Sec. 4. Section 280.16, subsection 6, Code 2025, is amended 32 to read as follows: 33 6. Information provided to the school under subsection 34 2 shall be kept on file in the office of the school nurse 35 -1- LSB 1676YC (5) 91 jda/jh 1/ 2 H.F. _____ or athletic trainer or, in the absence of a school nurse or 1 athletic trainer , the schoolâs administrator. 2